Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-116.5] Delivery of the contract
or certificate of insurance. If an application for a long-term care
insurance contract or certificate is approved, the issuer shall deliver the
contract or certificate of insurance to the applicant no later than thirty days
after the date of approval. [L 2007, c 233, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next